Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2743YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 502 Section 1. Section 256.146, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 28. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 3 establishing an activities administration authorization. 4 The rules must require an applicant for the activities 5 administration authorization to hold a baccalaureate degree or 6 higher in any academic field. 7